Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska24-733
Retired judge; temporary duty; request for compensation and expenses.

Within fifteen days following completion of a temporary duty assignment, the retired judge shall submit to the Chief Justice of the Supreme Court, on forms provided by the Chief Justice, a request for payment or reimbursement for services rendered and expenses incurred during such temporary duty assignment. Upon receipt of such request, the Chief Justice shall endorse on the request that the services were performed and expenses incurred pursuant to an assignment of the Supreme Court of Nebraska and file such request with the proper authority for payment.

Laws 1974, LB 832, § 5;

Laws 1979, LB 240, § 2;

Laws 1984, LB 13, § 35;

Laws 1988, LB 864, § 4.